Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2702
Legislative findings and declarations.

The Legislature finds and declares that the public interest requires the regulation of the practice of perfusion and the establishment of clear licensure standards for perfusionists and that the health and welfare of the residents of the State of Nebraska will be protected by identifying to the public those individuals who are qualified and legally authorized to practice perfusion.

Laws 2007, LB236, § 9;

R.S.Supp.,2007, § 71-1,391.